Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-164
Failure to comply with court order; effect.

Failure to comply with the terms of an order entered pursuant to section 43-163 shall not be grounds for setting aside an adoption decree, for revocation of a written consent to adoption after the consent has been approved by the court, or for revocation of a relinquishment of parental rights after the relinquishment has been accepted in writing by the Department of Health and Human Services as provided in section 43-106.01.

Laws 1993, LB 205, § 10;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 126;

Laws 1998, LB 1041, § 19.